2_vietnamese_morphology_rules.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +Redup   ! Reduplication
    +ToneCh  ! Tone change
    +ConsCh  ! Consonant change
    +IrrTone ! Irregular tone redup
    +Subst   ! Substitution
    +Insert  ! Insertion
    +Remove  ! Removal

LEXICON Root
    Adjectives ;
    Nouns ;
    Verbs ;

! =====================
! ==== Adjectives =====
! =====================

LEXICON Adjectives
    luôn     AdjRedup ;
    nhanh    AdjRedup ;
    lâu      AdjRedup ;
    đỏ       AdjTone ;
    trắng    AdjTone ;
    chầm     AdjTone ;
    biếc     AdjCons ;
    bốp      AdjCons ;
    thiếp    AdjCons ;
    lơ+%láo   AdjIrr ;
    thơ+%thẩn AdjIrr ;
    ngơ+%ngác AdjIrr ;

LEXICON AdjRedup
+Redup:   Repeat ;

LEXICON Repeat
+%luôn # ;
+%nhanh # ;
+%lâu # ;

LEXICON AdjTone
+ToneCh:''   ToneVariants ;

LEXICON ToneVariants
đo:đo+%đỏ     # ;
trăng:trăng+%trắng # ;
chầm:chầm+%%chậm   # ;

LEXICON AdjCons
+ConsCh:0   ConsVariants ;

LEXICON ConsVariants
+biêng:biêng+%biếc   # ;
+bôm:bôm+%bốp      # ;
+thiêm:thiêm+%thiếp  # ;

LEXICON AdjIrr
+IrrTone:''   IrrVariants ;

LEXICON IrrVariants
+thơ+%thẩn:thơ+%thơ+%thẩn+%thẩn   # ;
+lơ+%láo:lơ+%lơ+%láo+%láo         # ;
+ngơ+%ngác:ngơ+%ngơ+%ngác+%ngác   # ;

! =================
! ==== Nouns ======
! =================

LEXICON Nouns
trời     NSubst ;

LEXICON NSubst
+Subst:'' SubstVariants ;

LEXICON SubstVariants
+chời:chời   # ;

! =================
! ==== Verbs ======
! =================

LEXICON Verbs
ăn     VInsert ;
đã+%ăn  VRemove ;

LEXICON VInsert
+Insert:'' InsertVariants ;

LEXICON InsertVariants
+đang:đang+%ăn  # ;

LEXICON VRemove
+Remove:'' RemoveVariants ;

LEXICON RemoveVariants
+đã:ăn  # ;

END
